Illinois, session 104th, HB4882.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Future 5of Work Act of 2026. 6    Section 5. Findings and declaration of policy. The General 7Assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares the following:8        (1) The future of work is a critically important 9    conversation for those currently in the workforce as well 10    as those looking to reenter or enter it as Illinois 11    contemplates an equitable economic recovery from the 12    coronavirus pandemic.13        (2) Policymakers at every level of government will be 14    required to deal with the concurrent crises of the 15    pandemic recovery and creating good-paying jobs. 16    Policymakers must be able to anticipate the workforce 17    policies and programs needed in the future to combat 18    poverty and inequality.19        (3) Rapid advancements in technology, specifically the 20    automation of jobs and expanded artificial intelligence 21    capability, have had and will continue to have a profound 22    impact on the type, quality, and number of jobs available 23    in the 21st century economy.  HB4882 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 20243 SPS 33694 b1        (4) Automation and the rise of artificial intelligence 2    and predictive analytics will have major impacts on 3    industries and their jobs; from the service sector to 4    white collar positions, the impacts will be felt by 5    millions of workers in the United States.6        (5) Despite the opportunities and challenges presented 7    by rapid advancements in technology, Illinois is a leader 8    in the innovation and development of technology. Illinois 9    has been an engine of progress, and it drives new products 10    that connect people across the globe, sparking economic 11    growth and building prosperity.12        (6) Illinois has a large, diverse, and well-educated 13    labor force ready to meet the challenges it faces.14        (7) Innovative partnerships across the private and 15    public sectors need to be created. 16    Section 10. Future of Work Task Force; duties and 17responsibilities.18    (a) The Future of Work Task Force is created. The Task 19Force shall be proactive and plan for the future of work while 20simultaneously addressing the state of work today.21    (b) The duties and responsibilities of the Task Force 22include the following:23        (1) identify and assess the new and emerging 24    technologies that have the potential to significantly 25    affect employment, wages, and skill requirements;  HB4882 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 20243 SPS 33694 b1        (2) develop a set of job standards and working 2    conditions that will ensure that future work in this State 3    builds a vibrant middle class;4        (3) identify the potential jobs of the future and 5    opportunities to shape those jobs for the improvement of 6    life for residents of this State;7        (4) compile research and best practices from other 8    states and countries on how to deploy technology to 9    benefit workers and the public good;10        (5) develop tools to assess the impact of proposed 11    technologies and evaluate their costs and benefits on 12    workers, employers, the public, and the State;13        (6) identify policies and practices that will help 14    businesses, workers, and communities thrive economically 15    throughout this State; and16        (7) propose workforce development, training, 17    education, and apprenticeship programs for the jobs of the 18    future. 19    Section 15. Membership; meetings.20    (a) The members of the Task Force shall include and 21represent the diversity of the people of this State, and shall 22be composed of the following: 23        (1) four members, including one representative of the 24    business community and one representative of the labor 25    community, appointed by the Senate President, one of whom   HB4882 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 20243 SPS 33694 b1    shall serve as co-chair;2        (2) four members, including one representative of the 3    business community and one representative of the labor 4    community, appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate, 5    one of whom shall serve as co-chair;6        (3) four members, including one representative of the 7    business community and one representative of the labor 8    community, appointed by the Speaker of the House of 9    Representatives, one of whom shall serve as co-chair; 10        (4) four members, including one representative of the 11    business community and one representative of the labor 12    community, appointed by the Minority Leader of the House 13    of Representatives, one of whom shall serve as co-chair;14        (5) four members who are appointed by the Governor and 15    advocate for job growth, with one representative coming 16    from each of the following groups: the business community, 17    the labor community, the environmental community, and the 18    education community;19        (6) three members appointed by the Governor whose 20    professional expertise is at the juncture of work and 21    workers' rights;22        (7) the Director of Labor or the Director's designee;23        (8) the Director of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 24    or the Director's designee;25        (9) the Director of Employment Security or the 26    Director's designee;  HB4882 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 20243 SPS 33694 b1        (10) the Superintendent of the State Board of 2    Education or his or her designee;3        (11) the Executive Director of the Illinois Community 4    College Board or the Executive Director's designee; and5        (12) the Executive Director of the Board of Higher 6    Education or the Executive Director's designee.7    (b) The initial appointments to the Task Force must be 8finalized by August 31, 2027. Members of the Task Force shall 9serve 5-year terms, and each member shall serve until the 10member's successor is appointed. After members are appointed, 11the Task Force shall hold one meeting per month for a total of 127 meetings before the final report required under subsection 13(b) of Section 20 is submitted, and the first meeting must be 14held within 30 days after appointments are finalized.15    (c) Members of the Task Force shall serve without 16compensation.17    (d) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 18shall provide administrative support to the Task Force. 19    Section 20. Report; dissolution.20    (a) The Task Force shall issue a report based upon its 21findings in the course of performing its duties and 22responsibilities specified under Section 10. The report shall 23be written by an independent authority with subject matter 24expertise on the future of work.25    (b) The Task Force shall submit its final report to the   HB4882 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 20243 SPS 33694 b1Governor and the General Assembly no later than August 31, 22028, and every 5 years thereafter. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.